Utah statutes.
63M-1-204.   Organization of office -- Jurisdiction of director.

(1)  Unless otherwise expressly provided by statute, the director may organize the office in any fashion considered appropriate, including the appointment of deputy directors of the office.

(2)  The director may make consolidations of personnel and service functions to effectuate efficiency and economy within the office.

